Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,136
Subdivided lands; additional facilities; no obligation to furnish.

An irrigation district within which subdivided land is situated, shall not be required to build additional laterals or provide other facilities for the purpose of delivering water to such subdivided land, but shall only be required to deliver water for the irrigation of such subdivided land through the laterals or other facilities in existence before such transfer or subdivision was made.

Laws 1933, c. 89, § 2, p. 360;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-1,103;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,136.

"Facilities" under this section is limited to something built or constructed for the purpose of delivering irrigation water, and flooding over the land is not a facility within the meaning of the statute. Hengen v. Hengen, 211 Neb. 276, 318 N.W.2d 269 (1982).